Alabama, session 2026rs, SB241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Judge of Probate of Walker County
may appoint, from the qualified electors of Walker County
licensed to practice law in this state, one or more temporary
judges of probate to serve contemporaneously with him or her
when the elected judge of probate finds that the temporary
appointments are necessary due to calendar congestion,
complexity of issues, the prospects of an unduly long trial,
or caseload management.
(b) No temporary appointment may be for a term longer
than 90 days.
(c) A temporary judge of probate may be appointed for
as many successive 90-day appointments as the elected judge of
probate deems necessary, but no individual may serve for more
than 200 days during any calendar year.
(d) All temporary judges of probate shall have the
jurisdiction and authority and shall discharge the duties of
the elected judge of probate, and the judgments, orders, and
decrees made or rendered by any temporary judge of probate
shall be entered on the records of the probate court and shall
have the force and effect and be subject to revision, appeal,
or other revisory remedy of judgments, orders, and decrees of
the probate court or the elected judge of probate.
Page 1

the probate court or the elected judge of probate.
SB241 Enrolled
(e) Neither the elected judge of probate nor the surety
on his or her bond shall be responsible for any of the acts,
failures to act, reports, or decisions made by any temporary
judge of probate, or any of the acts or failures to act of any
employee in the probate court during the tenure of a temporary
judge of probate.
(f) A temporary judge of probate shall be paid fifty
dollars ($50) per hearing paid from the discretionary funds of
the judge of probate. If the temporary judge of probate is an
employee of the probate court, the employee shall not receive
any additional compensation.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
SB241 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB241
Senate 12-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 17-Mar-26




By: Senator Woods
Page 3